Illinois, session 104th, SB1006.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Gambling Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 10/1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2401)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the Illinois Gambling Act.9(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.)